Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.100

Uniform disciplinary act—Application.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a license or certification, and the discipline of persons licensed or certified under this chapter.

[ 2015 c 118 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.